District of Columbia statutes.
22-1201

Repealed

Debt adjusting; prohibitions; exceptions; penalties; prosecutions for violations.

Repealed.

May 22, 1970, 84 Stat. 264, Pub. L. 91-266
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 19, 41 DCR 1639
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 6, 50 DCR 10996
1981 Ed., § 22-3426.
1973 Ed., § 22-3426.